Hawaii statutes.
§165-1 Findings and purpose. The
legislature finds that when nonagricultural land uses extend into agricultural
areas, farming operations often become the subject of nuisance lawsuits that
may result in the premature removal of lands from agricultural use and may
discourage future investments in agriculture. The legislature also finds that
under the Hawaii State Planning Act, it is a declared policy of this State to
"foster attitudes and activities conducive to maintaining agriculture as a
major sector of Hawaii's economy." Accordingly, it is the purpose of this
chapter to reduce the loss to the State of its agricultural resources by
limiting the circumstances under which farming operations may be deemed to be a
nuisance. [L 1982, c 256, pt of §1; am L 1986, c 242, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next